Hawaii, session 2025, GM1338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The purpose of this part is to:
(1) Rename the department of agriculture as the department
of agriculture and biosecurity, and the board of
agriculture as the board of agriculture and
biosecurity; and
(2) Clarify the composition of the board of agriculture
and biosecurity.
SECTION 2. Section 26-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending its title and subsection (a) to read as
follows:
"§26-16 Department of agriculture[—] and biosecurity. (a)
The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall be headed by
an executive board to be known as the board of agriculture[—]
and biosecurity. The board shall consist of ten members:
(1) One who shall be a resident of the county of Hawaii;
(2) One who shall be a resident of the county of Maui;
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO
■iniiinBiiiioiiii

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) One who shall be a resident of the county of Kauai;
(4) Four at large; and
(5) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources; the director of business, economic
development, and tourism; and the dean of the
University of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture
and human [re-s-eurcoG, ] resilience, or their designated
representatives, who shall serve as ex officio[+],[+]
voting members.
The majority of the members of the board described in
paragraphs (1) through (4) shall be from the agricultural
community or [the] agricultural support sector[—], with at least
one member having a background in biosecurity. The appointment,
tenure, and removal of the members and the filling of vacancies
on the board shall be as provided in section 26-34. The
governor shall appoint a chairperson of the board from the
members."
SECTION 3. Section 26-56, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The commission shall review and recommend an
appropriate salary for the governor, lieutenant governor.
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

llllilllllllilM

Page 3 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
members of the legislature, justices and judges of all state
courts, administrative director of the State or an equivalent
position, and department heads or executive officers and the
deputies or assistants to the department heads of the
departments of;
(1) Accounting and general services;
(2) Agriculture [•#•] and biosecurity;
(3) The attorney general;
(4) Budget and finance;
(5) Business, economic development, and tourism;
(6) Commerce and consumer affairs;
(7) Corrections and rehabilitation;
(8) Defense;
(9) Hawaiian home lands;
(10) Health;
(11) Human resources development;
(12) Human services;
(13) Labor and industrial relations;
(14) Land and natural resources;
(15) Law enforcement;
(16) Taxation; and
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(17) Transportation.
The commission shall not review the salary of any position
in the department of education or the University of Hawaii.
The commission may recommend different salaries for
department heads and executive officers and different salary
ranges for deputies or assistants to department heads; provided
that the commission shall recommend the same salary range for
deputies or assistants to department heads within the same
department; provided further that the appointing official shall
specify the salary for a particular position within the
applicable range.
The commission shall not recommend salaries lower than
salary amounts recommended by prior commissions replaced by this
section. "
SECTION 4. Section 141-42, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) An individual or entity licensed to produce hemp
pursuant to subsection (a) may transport hemp within the State
to a facility authorized by law to process hemp or to another
licensed producer's grow area; provided that the transportation
has been reported to the department of agriculture[—] and
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
biosecurity. The department of agriculture and biosecurity may
require movement reports that include copies of the United
States Department of Agriculture test results for the hemp to be
transported and may deny authorization if the hemp is found to
not comply with any law or regulation."
SECTION 5. Section 142-18, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§142-18 Disposal of tuberculous animals. The owner of
all cattle reacting to the tuberculin test shall, subject to
section 142-16, cause them to be segregated immediately and,
within a reasonable time thereafter, to be delivered for
slaughter at such time and place as may be designated by the
department of agriculture [-r] and biosecurity. The slaughter
shall be under the direct supervision of the department and in
accordance with the meat inspection regulations of the United
States Department of Agriculture."
SECTION 6. Section 142-21, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§142-21 Cooperation with federal authorities. The
department of agriculture and biosecurity may cooperate with the
United States Department of Agriculture in its efforts to
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
eradicate bovine tuberculosis or any other transmissible disease
of animals, and may make appraisals of condemned animals and
report on the salvage derived from the sale of the animals in
conformity with the regulations of the United States Department
of Agriculture."
SECTION 7. Section 147-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§147-52 Grades, standards and classifications; changes.
The standards for grading and classifying food products that
have been or may be hereafter adopted, prescribed, or announced
by the United States Department of Agriculture or by or under
authority of the Congress of the United States are hereby
declared to be the official standards for grading and
classifying such food products for the State; provided that the
department of agriculture and biosecurity may establish and
prescribe other and different, or additional, standards for
grading and classifying any such products, to the extent
permitted by the laws of the United States, which standards, so
established and prescribed by the department, shall be the
official standards for grading and classifying any such food
products for the State. The department may also establish and
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO e

Page 7 H.B. NO.
'^0^
C.D. 1
prescribe official standards for grading and classifying any or
all food products for which no standards have been adopted,
prescribed, or announced by the United States Department of
Agriculture or by or under authority of the Congress. The
department may change any standards established and prescribed
by it hereunder from time to time,"
SECTION 8. Section 147-53, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§147-53 Department; grades, standards_^ and
classifications; factors. In establishing any grades,
standards, or classifications for any food product,, the
department of agriculture[—] and biosecurity, in addition to
such factors as may be specified in any other law, shall take
into account and base the grades, standards, or classifications
upon such of the following factors as shall be applicable to the
product involved: degree of maturity; size, measured by
dimensions or weight; degree of freshness, as determined by
physical examination or chemical test or analysis; moisture
content; uniformity; color; firmness; tenderness; defects;
injury; damage; diseases; appearance; mixture of varieties;
decay; conformation; soundness; varietal characteristics or
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

H.B. NO. 5,2
C.D. 1
type; number of specimens per pound; nature of pack; presence of
dirt or other foreign material; condition as to temperature and
extent to which the product is hot or heating or is in a sour
condition; extent to which product is satisfactory for human or
other consumption or use; extent to which the product has been
affected by handling or treatment; extent to which the product
has a commercially objectionable flavor or odor; and other
factors indicative of class, quality, or condition, and of the
value or suitability of the product involved for the commercial
or other use to be made thereof. In addition_^ the department
shall take into account any grades, standards, or
classifications for such product established by the United
States Department of Agriculture and also applicable federal
grades and standard laws."
SECTION 9. Section 147-57, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§147-57 Department, rules and regulations, contracts,
cooperation, fees. The department of agriculture[—] and
biosecurity, in addition to powers granted by this part or any
other law, shall have all powers necessary or convenient to
carry out and effectuate this part, including the following:
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO g

Page 9 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) To prescribe rules and regulations, not inconsistent
with this part, respecting: the standards for grading
and classifying, and the grades, standards, and
classification for, food products; the inspection,
grading, and classification of food products; the
determination and certification of the grade,
classification, quality, and condition of food
products and such other pertinent facts as the
department may deem advisable; the licensing of
inspectors, graders, and samplers and the duties of
such inspectors, graders, and samplers; methods of
test, analysis, and examination in determining the
grade, classification, quality, and condition of food
products; the official word or words, figure, or
letter to indicate official grade or standards of
quality or condition of food products; the design,
form, and use of official labels and statements for
use on packages or containers of products inspected,
graded, classified, and certified under this part; and
continuous factory inspection, grading,
classification, and certification of food products;
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

IHHIHnilMMM

Page 10 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) To contract with the United States Department of
Agriculture for the services of an inspector or
inspectors employed by the department and the
establishment of a cooperative inspection service with
the United States government;
(3) To cooperate with the United States or any department
thereof, in accomplishing the matters or things
provided for herein; and
(4) To fix, assess, and collect, or cause to be collected,
fees for inspecting or classifying food products, such
fees to be on a uniform basis in an amount reasonably
necessary to cover, as nearly as may be, the cost of
the inspection and the administration of this part;
provided that the department may adjust the fees to be
collected hereunder to meet the expenses necessary to
carry out the provisions hereof and may prescribe a
different scale of fees for different localities;
[end] provided further that the department may
prescribe a reasonable charge for traveling expenses
and services. Charges for continuous factory
inspection and grading may be fixed, assessed, and
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO K

Page 11 H.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
collected on such contract basis as will reimburse the
State for the salary and all expenses of the factory
inspector or grader, to which shall be added an
appropriate percentage of charges assessed to cover,
as nearly as practicable, administrative overhead
expense."
SECTION 10. Section 147-74, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§147-74 Grading standards and regulations. Subject to
chapter 91, the department of agriculture and biosecurity may
make rules with respect to:
(1) Sale and transportation for sale of eggs for human
consumption;
(2) Specific grades or standards of quality, condition^
and size or weight classes which shall conform when
practical to those established by the United States
Department of Agriculture as local conditions will
permit;
(3) Inspection and classification;
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

■mnHniimniM

Page 12 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(4) Assessment and collection of fees for requested
certification as to grade, standard of quality,
condition, and size or weight classes;
(5) Labeling of containers of imported and locally
produced eggs and marking of individual imported eggs
as to origin;
(6) Seller's invoice for sale of eggs;
(7) Records of imported shell eggs of foreign origin;
(8) Methods of determining egg quality, which shall not
include recandling or any other method applied to eggs
in interstate commerce which is discriminatory or
impairs that commerce in any way or requires a cost
increase of eggs in interstate commerce; and
(9) Enforcement of this part and of the rules adopted
under this part."
SECTION 11. Section 147-93, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§147-93 Cooperating with federal authority. The
department of agriculture and biosecurity may enter into
cooperative agreements with the United States Department of
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

■■■IIDMIHill

Page 13 H1 .. B.. N'a O.
g 2
C.D. 1
Agriculture for the purpose of grading beef, pork, mutton, and
lamb carcasses."
SECTION 12. Section 159-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-bl §^59-2 [j-] Findings and declaration of necessity. It
is hereby declared that the meat industry is a paramount
agricultural industry of this State and the production and
marketing of meat is an enterprise that is of significant
importance to the economy of this State and to the health of the
consuming public. It is essential to the public health and
welfare of consumers that they be protected by assuring that
meat and meat products distributed to them are wholesome, not
adulterated, and properly marked, labeled, and packaged.
Unwholesome, adulterated, or misbranded meat or meat products
are injurious to the public health and welfare, destroy markets
for wholesome, unadulterated, and properly labeled and packaged
meat and meat products and result in sundry losses to livestock
producers and processors of meat and meat products, as well as
injury to consumers. The unwholesome, adulterated, mislabeled,
or deceptively packaged articles can be sold at lower prices and
compete unfairly with the wholesome, unadulterated, and properly
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO 13
■HIHHIIIillllBnill

Page 14 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
labeled and packaged articles, to the detriment of consumers and
the public generally. It is hereby found that regulation by the
department of agriculture and biosecurity and cooperation by
this State with the United States Department of Agriculture as
contemplated by this Hawaii Meat Inspection Act is appropriate
to protect the health and welfare of consumers and otherwise to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter.
Congress enacted the Meat Inspection Act in 1907 (Public
Law 59-242), as amended by the Wholesome Meat Act in 1967
(Public Law 90-201) which is now redesignated as the Federal
Meat Inspection Act. The Federal Meat Inspection Act is
intended to protect the consuming public from adulterated or
misbranded meat and meat products and to assist the states in
their efforts to accomplish this objective. The Federal Meat
Inspection Act authorizes the Secretary of Agriculture to
furnish financial and related assistance to states for the
administration of meat inspection programs which conform to
established federal standards up to fifty per cent of the
estimated total cost of the cooperative program. Presently, the
meat processing industry in this State is not subject to any
meat inspection law or rules and regulations that meet the
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO iz

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
minimum federal requirement in this area. This State, in order
to qualify for the cooperative program, must demonstrate
"progressive action" by November 15, 1969; and, further, all
physical facilities must be upgraded in accordance with the
established federal standards by November 15, 1970. Failure to
comply with the federal standards prescribed by the Federal Meat
Inspection Act will result in federal control of the meat and
meat processing industries of the State. Accordingly, the State
deems it to be in the best interest of the public health and
welfare to take those steps as are necessary to qualify for
federal financial and related assistance for the administration
of a meat inspection program which conforms to federal standards
prescribed in the Federal Meat Inspection Act."
SECTION 13. Section 161-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§161-2 Findings and declaration of necessity. It is
hereby declared that the poultry industry is a paramount
agricultural industry of this State and the production and
marketing of poultry is an enterprise that is of significant
importance to the economy of the State and to the health of the
consuming public. It is essential to the public health and
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO !■
ifflinniniiiniiH

Page 16 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
welfare of consumers that they be protected by assuring that
poultry or poultry products distributed to them are wholesome,
not adulterated, and properly marked, labeled, and packaged.
Unwholesome, adulterated, or misbranded poultry or poultry
products are injurious to the public health and welfare, destroy
markets for wholesome, not adulterated, and properly labeled and
packaged poultry or poultry products, and result in sundry
losses to poultry producers and processors of poultry as well as
injury to consumers. The unwholesome, adulterated, mislabeled,
or deceptively packaged articles can be sold at lower prices and
compete unfairly with the wholesome, not adulterated, and
properly labeled and packaged articles, to the detriment of
consumers and the public generally. It is hereby found that
regulation by the department of agriculture and biosecurity and
cooperation by this State with the United States Department of
Agriculture as contemplated by this chapter is appropriate to
protect the health and welfare of consumers and otherwise to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter.
The 90th Congress enacted Public Law 90-492, entitled "The
Wholesome Poultry Products Act", which is now redesignated as
the "Poultry Products Inspection Act". The Poultry Products
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 17 H.B. NO. ^.2
C.D. 1
Inspection Act is intended to protect the consuming public from
adulterated or misbranded poultry or poultry products and to
assist the states in their efforts to accomplish this objective.
The Poultry Products Inspection Act authorizes the United States
Secretary of Agriculture to furnish financial and related
assistance to states for the administration of poultry
inspection programs which conform to established federal
standards up to fifty per cent of the estimated total cost of
the cooperative program. Hawaii's poultry industry is not
subject to poultry inspection law or rules and regulations that
meet the minimum federal requirement in this area. In order to
qualify for the cooperative program, the State must demonstrate
"progressive action" by July 18, 1970; and, further, all
physical facilities must be upgraded in accordance with the
established federal standards by July 18, 1971. Failure to
comply with the standards prescribed by the Poultry Products
Inspection Act will result in federal control of the poultry or
poultry processing industries of the State. Accordingly, the
State of Hawaii deems it to be in the interest of the State's
public health and welfare to take [such] steps as are necessary
to qualify for federal financial and related assistance for the
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO r

Page 18 H.B. NO. ^2
C.D. 1
administration of a poultry inspection program which conforms to
federal standards prescribed in the Poultry Products Inspection
Act. "
SECTION 14. Section 205-47, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows;
"(b) Each county shall develop maps of potential lands to
be considered for designation as important agricultural lands in
consultation and cooperation with landowners[—]£ the department
of agriculture[—] and biosecurity; agricultural interest groups,
including representatives from the Hawaii Farm Bureau Federation
and other agricultural organizations[—]£ the United States
Department of Agriculture - Natural Resources Conservation
Service[—]£ the office of planning and sustainable
development[—]£ and other groups as necessary."
SECTION 15. Section 219-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§219-8 Participation in loans by the department.
(1) The department of agriculture and biosecurity may
provide funds for a share, not to exceed ninety per
cent, of the principal amount of a loan made to a
qualified aquaculturist by a private lender who is
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 19 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
otherwise unable [etberwise] to lend the applicant
sufficient funds at reasonable rates where the
qualified farmer is unable to obtain sufficient funds
for the same purpose from the United States Department
of Agriculture;
(2) Participation loans under this section shall be
limited by the provisions of section 219-6 and the
department of [agriculturo's] agriculture and
biosecurity's share shall not exceed the maximum
amounts specified therefor;
(3) Interest charged on the private lender's share of the
loan shall not be more than the sum of two per cent
above the lowest rate of interest charged by all state
or national banks authorized to accept or hold
deposits in the State on secured short term loans made
to borrowers who have the highest credit rating with
those banks;
(4) The private lender's share of the loan may be insured
by the department up to ninety per cent of the
principal balance of the loan, under section 219-7;
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


" H.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
(5) When a participation loan has been approved by the
department, its share shall be paid to the
participating private lender for disbursement to the
borrower. The private lender shall collect all
payments from the borrower and otherwise service the
loan;
(6) Out of interest collected, the private lender may be
paid a service fee to be determined by the department
[wfeieh—fee] that shall not exceed one per cent of the
unpaid principal balance of the loan; provided that
this fee shall not be added to any amount which the
borrower is obligated to pay;
(7) The participating private lender may take over a
larger percentage or the full principal balance of the
loan at any time that it has determined, to the
satisfaction of the department, that the borrower is
able to pay any increased interest charges resulting;
and
(8) Security for participation loans shall be limited by
section 219-5(a)(6). All collateral documents shall
be held by the private lender. Division of interest
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 21 H.B. NO. 5,^
C.D. 1
in collateral received shall be in proportion to
participation by the department and the private
lender."
SECTION 16. Section 460J-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§460J-26 Exemptions. This chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Officials of the federal government on military
reservations;
(2) Personnel of the United States Department of
Agriculture, [-fefee] state department of agriculture [—
©±^1 and biosecurity, state department of land and
natural resources, or [the] United States Public
Health Service in the performance of their official
duties;
(3) Other government employees who conduct research on
pesticides or pest control or who use pesticides in
the performance of their duties;
(4) Qualified scientific personnel specially exempted by
the board;
(5) Persons engaged in pest control for agricultural
purposes; or
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 22 H.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
(6) Engineers or architects licensed under chapter 464
who:
(A) Draft or prepare design documents that prescribe
anti-termite or anti-pest measures, including the
specification of termiticides, that are required
by the building code and other governmental
agencies;
(B) Conduct building condition or assessment surveys
to observe and evaluate the condition of the
building or structure, if the primary purpose of
these surveys is not to report on the
identification of infestations; or
(C) Prepare reports based on the results of the
surveys specified in subparagraph (B) that
identify the location, extent, and probable cause
of the pest damage (e.g., "termite damage");
provided that where a report concerns termite
damage, the particular type or species of termite
shall not be specified unless the report is
written in consultation with a licensed pest
control operator licensed in termite control or
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 22
iHiiiiiimm

Page 23 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
other duly recognized expert in urban entomology,
such as an insect taxonomist or urban
entomologist with expertise in the identification
or control of termites; and provided further that
if a licensed pest control operator is not
consulted, the report shall include a
recommendation that a licensed pest control
operator be contracted for further assessment or
treatment."
SECTION 17. Sections 6E-61, 23-12, 26-4, 26-16(d), 46-67,
141-1, 141-3, 141-3.6, 141-4, 141-5, 141-6, 141-7, 141-9, 141-
12, 141-12.5, 141-13, 141-14, 141-15, 141-16, 141-17, 141-43,
141-51, 141-53, 141D-1, 141D-2, 142-1, 142-2, 142-3, 142-3.5,
142-4, 142-5, 142-6, 142-7, 142-8, 142-9, 142-12, 142-13,
142-16, 142-19, 142-20, 142-22, 142-23, 142-23.1, 142-23.5, 142-
29, 142-31, 142-41, 142-43, 142-49, 142-92, 142-93, 142-98, 142-
100, 142-101, 142-111, 143-2.2, 144-1, 145-1, 145-3, 145-7, 145-
8, 145-9, 145-27, 145D-5, 146-22, 147-1, 147-21, 147-31, 147-32,
147-51, 147-54, 147-55, 147-56, 147-58, 147-59, 147-60, 147-73,
147-75, 147-76, 147-78, 147-80, 147-91, 147-92, 147-94, 147-95,
147-96, 147-97, 147-101, 147-102, 147-111, 147-116, 147-122,
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

iniigHiiaiHiiiMiii

Page 24 H.B. NO.
S
i
C.D. 1
148-1, 148-2, 148-61, 148-62, 148-63, 148-64, 148-66, 149A-2,
150-21, 150A-2, 150A-6.3, 150A-11.5, 152-1, 155-1, 155-2, 155-4,
155-5, 155-5.5, 155-5.6, 155-6, 155-6.5, 155-8, 155-9, 155-11,
155-12, 155-13, 155-14, 155-31, 155D-1, 157-1, 157-13, 159-3,
159-15, 161-3, 161-6, 163D-4, 166-2, 166-3, 166-11, 166E-1,
166E-2, 166E-3, 167-22, 167-23, 169-1, 171-2, 171-3, 171-37.5,
171-55.5, 171-59, 171-64.7, 171-112, 171-117, 173A-4, 173A-5,
174C-31, 187A-6.5, 194-2, 205-6, 205-44.5, 205-45, 205-45.5,
205-48, 205-49, 205-50, 205A-62, 206E-34, 219-2, 219-4, 219-7,
219-9, 235-110.93, 261-4.5, 266-21.5, 269-26.5, 342G-47, 421-6,
421-21.6, 460J-21, 460J-24.5, and 486-1, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, and the title of chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
are amended by substituting the term "department of agriculture
and biosecurity", or similar term, wherever the term "department
of agriculture", or similar term, appears, except within the
term "United States Department of Agriculture", as the context
requires.
SECTION 18. Sections 10-41, 26-34, 84-17, 84-18, 128E-2,
141-6, 141-9, 141-12, 141-51, 141D-2, 142-3.5, 142-3.6, 142-
23.1, 142-28.5, 142-29, 142-31, 144-10, 145-22, 145-27, 147-9,
147-24, 147-34, 147-58, 147-59, 147-60, 148-1, 149A-2, 149A-
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 24

Page 25 HI 1 .B. IN O.
. g p 2
C.D, 1
32.5, 150A-2, 155-3, 155-5.6, 155-6.5, 155-9, 155-13, 155-14,
155-33, 157-1, 157-14, 157-15, 157-18, 157-22, 157-23, 157-24,
157-25, 157-26, 157-27, 157-29, 157-41, 157-42, 159-3, 161-3,
163D-3, 166-2, 166-3, 166-4, 166-5, 166-6, 166-11, 166E-1, 166E-
2, 166E-3, 167-1, 167-2, 167-3, 167-4, 167-5, 167-6, 167-7, 167-
9, 167-11, 167-12, 167-13, 167-14, 167-15, 167-16, 167-17, 167-
18, 167-19, 167-20, 167-21, 167-22, 168-1, 168-2, 168-3, 168-4,
168-5, 168-6, 168-7, 168-8, 169-3, 195-6, 205-44, 210D-5, 219-2,
219-3, 219-4, 220-1, 225P-3, 225P-4, 279A-4, 330C-3, 371-19,
460J-2, and 486-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, are amended by
substituting the term "board of agriculture and biosecurity", or
similar term, wherever the term "board of agriculture", or
similar term, appears, as the context requires.
SECTION 19. Sections 26-52 and 194-2 (b), Hawaii Revised
Statutes, are amended by substituting the words "agriculture and
biosecurity", or similar term, wherever the word "agriculture",
or similar term, appears, as the context requires.
PART II
SECTION 20. The purpose of this part is to establish a new
deputy chairperson position within the department of agriculture
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 25

Page 26 H.B. NO. 5-
C.D. 1
and biosecurity, to be known as the deputy chairperson for
biosecurity.
SECTION 21. Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§141- Deputy chairperson for biosecurity; established.
(a) There is established within the department a deputy
chairperson for biosecurity. The deputy chairperson for
biosecurity shall oversee all of the department's biosecurity
initiatives, including programs under chapters 142 and 150A and
sections 141-5, 261-4.5, and 266-21.5.
(b) The deputy chairperson for biosecurity shall be a
deputy to the chairperson of the board of agriculture and
biosecurity and be appointed, without regard to chapter 76, by
the governor. The salary of the deputy chairperson for
biosecurity shall be as provided in section 26-53 for first
deputies or first assistants to the head of any department."
PART III
SECTION 22. Chapter 150A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part VI to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 27 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"§150A- Biosecurity emergency. (a) The department,
with the approval of the governor, may declare a biosecurity
emergency if:
(1) There has been in the State an outbreak or occurrence
of a pest or prohibited or restricted organism that
has the potential to cause significant economic or
environmental loss if the pest or organism becomes
established in the State;
(2) There is established in one area of the State a pest
or prohibited or restricted organism that has the
potential to cause significant economic or
environmental loss if the pest or organism expands to
other areas within a county or becomes established in
another area of the State; or
(3) A pest or prohibited or restricted organism is, or
threatens to be, beyond the State's ability to
control.
(b) A biosecurity emergency shall automatically terminate
one hundred calendar days after its declaration, unless the
declaration is extended by the department with the approval of
the governor.
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

Page 28 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(c) For the duration of a declared biosecurity emergency:
(1) The department shall be exempt from chapter 103D;
(2) The Hawaii invasive species council shall work with
the chairperson; and
(3) The governor may transfer moneys to the department
from any account within the governor's control.
(d) The governor may requisition and take control of any
goods, real property, or watercraft required for the purposes of
this section, or requisition and take control of the temporary
use thereof; provided that:
(1) This subsection shall not apply to any vessel that:
(A) Has anti-fouling hull coating; and
(B) Does not discharge ballast water, uses freshwater
for ballasting, or is equipped with ultraviolet
filtration systems for ballast water;
(2) The requisition shall be made by serving notice upon
any person found in occupation of the premises or
having the property in the person's custody,
possession, or control, and a like notice shall also
be served upon any person who has filed with the
governor, or with a person the governor designates for
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 29 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the purpose, a request for notice with respect to the
property; provided further that if any person entitled
to compensation for the property is unable to be
served, the governor shall publish a notice of the
requisition at the earliest practicable date; and
(3) A requisition shall terminate automatically one
hundred calendar days after the declaration of a
biosecurity emergency, or by a separate proclamation
of the governor, whichever occurs first.
(e) If the governor requisitions and takes control of any
property or the temporary use thereof, the owner, or other
person entitled thereto, shall be paid a sum, determined by the
governor to be fair and just compensation for the property or
use, within twenty days after the property has been
requisitioned and taken, or in monthly or lesser installments' if
the property is taken for temporary use.
If any person is unwilling to accept the sum determined by
the governor as full and complete compensation for the property
or use, the person shall be paid seventy-five per cent of that
sum and may sue the State for an additional sum that, when added
to the sum already received by the person, the person may
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO 2

Page 30 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
consider fair and just compensation for the property or use, in
the manner provided by chapter 661 for actions against the
State; provided that:
(1) Any suit under this section shall be instituted within
two years after the requisition in the case of the
taking of real property in fee simple, or within one
year after the requisition in all other cases, subject
to sections 657-13 to 657-15, which are hereby made
applicable to the suit;
(2) No more than six months shall be allowed for the
bringing of a suit after the appointment of a
conservator of a person under disability, or the
removal of the disability, or after the appointment of
personal representatives; and
(3) Recovery shall be confined to the fair market value of
the property or its fair rental value, as the case may
be, without any allowance for prospective profits, or
punitive or other damages.
If the owner of property, or other person entitled to
compensation for the requisitioning of property or use thereof,
is under a disability, or has died, and no conservator or
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 31 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
personal representative has been appointed, the State, acting
through the attorney general, may apply for the appointment of a
conservator or for the appointment of a personal representative.
(f) The governor shall appoint a board of three
disinterested certified appraisers with whom may be filed any
claim for damages arising out of any failure to return private
property, the temporary use of which was requisitioned, or which
was leased, or any claim for damages arising out of the
condition in which the private property is returned. No claim
may be filed for deterioration of property resulting from
ordinary wear and tear and not for any deterioration or damage,
except any that is shown to have resulted from the taking or use
of the property; provided that any claim shall be filed within
thirty days after the return of the property or after the
governor proclaims that all private property has been .returned
to the owners, whichever is earlier. The decision of the
appraisers shall be final and binding upon the governor and the
claimant. Either party may file a petition in the circuit court
within sixty days after the rendering of a decision of the board
of appraisers, praying for the decision of the court upon the
claim. The petition, if filed by the State, shall be entitled
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO 31

Page 32 H.B. NO.
Hr2
C.D. 1
in the name of the State by the attorney general and shall be
heard and decided by the circuit court without the intervention
of a jury. If filed by any other party, the petition shall be
filed, heard, and decided in the manner provided for suits
against the State. Appellate review may be had, subject to
chapter 602, in the manner provided for civil appeals from the
circuit courts. The court may order the joinder of other
parties or may allow other parties to intervene. Any award that
has become final shall be paid out of any funds available under
this chapter and, if not sufficient, out of the general revenues
of the State as appropriated."
SECTION 23. Section 150A-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§150A-52 Objectives of biosecurity program. The
objectives of the biosecurity program shall be to:
(1) Establish a multi-dimensional system to survey for and
prevent the entry into the State and interisland
movement of pests and prohibited or restricted
organisms without a permit;
(2) Respond effectively to eradicate, control, reduce, and
suppress incipient pest populations and established
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

■■IIHIIHNHWl

Page 33 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
pests and seize and dispose of prohibited or
restricted organisms without a permit; and
(3) Coordinate with partner agencies and organizations to
direct the control and eradication of [invasive
■spee-i-es—] pests . "
SECTION 24. Section 150A-53, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§150A-53 General actions to achieve objectives. (a) To
achieve the objectives of the biosecurity program, the
department shall plan for and, within available legislative
appropriations or through funding from other sources, implement
the following:
(1) Work with government agencies and agricultural
commodity exporters of other states and countries to
establish pre-entry inspection programs under which
inbound cargo into the State is inspected at the ports
of departure or other points outside the State;
(2) Establish, operate, or participate in operating port-
of-entry facilities where multiple government agencies
may inspect, quarantine, fumigate, disinfect, destroy,
or exclude as appropriate, articles that may harbor
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 34
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
pests or prohibited or restricted organisms or exclude
articles that are prohibited or restricted without a
permit, with the goals of:
(A) Performing inspections in an efficient,
effective, and expeditious manner for the
government agencies involved and for cargo
owners, carriers, and importers; and
(B) Providing for the proper and safe storage and
handling of cargo, especially agricultural and
food commodities, awaiting inspection;
(3) Develop, implement, and coordinate post-entry measures
to eradicate, control, reduce, and suppress pests and,
as appropriate, eradicate or seize and dispose of
prohibited or restricted organisms without a permit
that have entered the State;
(4) Collaborate with relevant government agencies,
agricultural commodity importers, and other persons to
examine and develop joint integrated systems to better
implement the biosecurity program;
(5) Improve cargo inspection capabilities and methods,
including enhancement of the content and submission
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 35 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
requirements for cargo manifests and agricultural
commodity ownership and movement certificates;
(6) Promote the production of agricultural commodities in
the State to reduce cargo shipments of imported
commodities into the State; and
(7) Provide public education on [■fehe]j_
(A) The negative effects of pests and prohibited or
restricted organisms without a permit, to the
environment and economy of the State[—]£
(B) Reporting pests and prohibited or restricted
organisms without a permit that are discovered or
suspected to be present in imported products; and
(C) Protecting imported products to prevent pest
infestation.
(b) For purposes of the biosecurity program, the
department may:
(1) Subpoena any necessary documentation from importers
relating to a discovered or suspected infestation of a
pest or prohibited or restricted organism; and
(2) Declare a biosecurity emergency pursuant to section
150A-
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

■■■■■■■■Illi

Page 36 H.B. NO. "2
C.D. 1
(c) The department shall establish parameters and
construction requirements for biosecurity facilities that
provide for and ensure the safety of agricultural and food
commodities consumed by Hawaii residents, including cold storage
facilities established by private-public partnerships to
preserve the quality and ensure the safety of the commodities
arriving at the State's airports and harbors."
PART IV
SECTION 25. The legislature finds that New Zealand's use
of transitional facilities has increased the country's
biosecurity while improving the efficiency of importing goods.
In New Zealand, most imported goods subject to inspection are
transported away from the airport or seaport to one of six
thousand five hundred privately-run secure transitional
facilities. At the transitional facility, a private individual
licensed by the government inspects the goods for disease,
infection, infestation, and other matters of concern.
The legislature further finds that New Zealand's process
allows for a more efficient flow of goods entering the country
by reducing delays or stoppages at the ports of entry while also
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

■niiBiiiimiHiiii

Page 37 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
ensuring that all relevant goods are properly inspected before
delivery to their destination.
The purpose of this part is to enhance Hawaii's biosecurity
measures by authorizing the establishment of similar
transitional facilities in the State along with licenses for
private individuals to inspect the imported goods.
SECTION 26. Chapter 150A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding five new sections to part II to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows;
"§150A-A Transitional facilities; uses. (a) Upon
notification by the department, items at a pier, airport, or
other place where the items are first received may be
transported to a transitional facility suitable for the items.
(b) Items transported pursuant to subsection (a) shall be
transported in a manner that they will not spread or be likely
to spread any infestation or infection of insects or diseases
that may be present.
(c) All costs and expenses incident to the use of a
transitional facility shall be borne by the importer or the
importer's agent. For the purposes of this subsection, "import"
(and any nounal, verbal, adjectival, adverbial, and other
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 37
iiiniiiiHiHHiiniiiiiwiiii

Page 38 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
I equivalent for the term used interchangeably in this subsection)
means to bring or attempt to bring goods or products into the
State, and includes items labeled or designated as samples, even
if not intended for retail sale, subject to this chapter.
(d) No items shall be transported out of a transitional
facility unless:
(1) Authorized by the department; or
(2) Certified by a biosecurity compliance auditor that the
items are free of diseases, infections, infestations,
and other items that the department deems relevant.
§150A-B Transitional facilities; established. The
department shall establish standards for transitional
facilities, including standards for the construction,
maintenance, and operation of transitional facilities. The
department may establish standards for transitional facilities
pursuant to the types of items stored by those facilities, and
corresponding classes of licensure.
§15QA-C Transitional facility license. (a) No person
shall operate a transitional facility without a transitional
facility license and under the terms of a signed compliance
agreement.
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 3i

Page 39 H.B. NO. S-
C.D. 1
(b) A person may apply to the department for a
transitional facility license. The application shall be made
under oath on forms provided by the department and shall contain
information as prescribed by the department, including the
following:
(1) The name, business address, telephone number, social
security number, and, where applicable, the federal
tax identification number of the applicant;
(2) The proposed location of the transitional facility;
ar^
(3) The type of items the transitional facility will hold.
(c) The department shall establish standards for
transitional facilities, including;
(1) Standards for construction, maintenance, security, and
operation; and
(2) Quarterly inspections; provided that the department
may perform periodic random inspections to ensure
compliance.
(d) The department may suspend or revoke a transitional
facility license if the transitional facility does not satisfy
the standards established by the department under subsection (c)
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 40 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
or the d^2a^^tment deter™mes t2iaX yTe tran^it ionaJ^^a^ili^ty J^
not in compliance under the terms of the compliance agreement.
§150A-D Biosecurity compliance auditor; certification.
(a)Tlie de£a^^tjnent shadA ce£td^fy ba^osecurd^tjz compliarice
auditors and offer training to individuals seeking a biosecurity
compliance auditor certification.
(b) The training shall include:
(1) The identification of diseases/ infections,
infestations, and other subjects that the department
deems relevant; and
(2) Procedures following the identification of a disease,
infection, infestation, or other subject that the
department deems relevant.
(c) Upon completion of the training and satisfaction of
other requirements under the compliance agreement, the
department shall issue a biosecurity compliance auditor
certification to the individual. The certification shall be
valid for one year, shall identify the specific transitional
facility where the biosecurity compliance auditor is authorized
to conduct compliance audits, and may be renewed under
requirements established by the department.
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO
■HiiinnHiiinaiiiM

Page 41 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(d) The department may require each biosecurity compliance
auditor to complete additional training as needed, including any
emergency training in the interests of biosecurity.
(e) The department may revoke or suspend any biosecurity
compliance auditor certification for good cause.
(f) A biosecurity compliance auditor may be employed by
the owner of a transitional facility.
(g) The department may charge reasonable fees for the
training, certification, and certification renewal under this
section.
§150A-E Biosecur£tjf com£li^iice auditor2 power£^ (a)
Subject to the terms of the compliance agreement, a certified
biosecurity compliance auditor may certify items located in a
transitional facility as free of diseases, infections,
infestations, and other items that the department deems
relevant.
(b) Unless authorized by the department, a certified
biosecurity compliance auditor shall not certify any items
located outside a transitional facility where the certified
biosecurity compliance auditor is authorized to conduct
inspections to ensure compliance.”
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 42 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 27. Section 150A-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Biosecurity compliance auditor" means an individual with
a valid biosecurity compliance auditor certification issued
under section 150A-D.
"Transitional facility" means a facility with a valid
transitional facility license issued under section 150A-C."
SECTION 28. Section 150A-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§150A-5 Conditions of importation. The importation into
the State of any of the following articles, viz., nursery-stock,
tree, shrub, herb, vine, cut-flower, cut-foliage, cutting,
graft, scion, bud, seed, leaf, root, or rhizome; nut, fruit, or
vegetable; grain, cereal, or legume in the natural or raw state;
moss, hay, straw, dry-grass, or other forage; unmanufactured
log, limb, or timber, or any other plant-growth or plant­
product, unprocessed or in the raw state; soil; microorganisms;
live bird, reptile, nematode, insect, or any other animal in any
stage of development (that is in addition to the so-called
domestic animal, the quarantine of which is provided for in
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 43 H.B. NO. g j
C.D. 1
chapter 142); box, vehicle, baggage, or any other container in
which the articles have been transported or any packing material
used in connection therewith shall be made in the manner
hereinafter set forth:
(1) Notification of arrival. Any person who receives for
transport or brings or causes to be brought to the
State as freight, air freight, baggage, or otherwise,
for the purpose of debarkation or entry therein, or as
ship's stores, any of the foregoing articles, shall,
immediately upon the arrival thereof, notify the
II department[7—in writing,] of the arrival, giving the
waybill number, container number, name and address of
the consignor, name and address of the consignee or
the consignee's agent in the State, marks, number of
packages, description of contents of each package,
port at which laden, and any other information that
may be necessary to locate or identify the same, and
shall hold the articles at the pier, airport, any
other place where they are first received or
discharged, or a transitional facility, in a manner
that they will not spread or be likely to spread any
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 44 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
infestation or infection of insects or diseases that
may be present until inspection and examination can be
made by the inspector or a certified biosecurity
compliance auditor to determine whether any
article, or any portion thereof, is infested or
infected with or contains any pest. The department
may adopt rules to require identification of specific
articles on negotiable and non-negotiable warehouse
receipts, bills of lading, or other documents of title
for inspection of pests. In addition, the department
shall adopt rules to designate restricted articles
that shall require:
(A) A permit from the department in advance of
importation; or
(B) A department letter of authorization or
registration in advance of importation.
The restricted articles shall include but not be
limited to certain microorganisms or living insects.
Failure to obtain the permit, letter of authorization.
or registration in advance is a violation of this
section;
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 45 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Individual passengers, officers, and crew.
(A) It shall be the responsibility of the
transportation company to distribute, prior to
the debarkation of passengers and baggage, the
State of Hawaii [plant and animal] biosecurity
declaration [form in paper or olcctronic form] to
each passenger, officer, and crew member of any
aircraft or vessel originating in the continental
United States or its possessions or from any
other area not under the jurisdiction of the
appropriate federal agency in order that the
passenger, officer, or crew member can comply
with the directions and requirements appearing
thereon. All passengers, officers, and crew
members, whether or not they are bringing or
causing to be brought for entry into the State
[the] any articles listed [eft-^fehe—fer^fi], shall
complete the declaration, except that one adult
member of a family may complete the declaration
for other family members. Any person who
[de-facGG the -doclaration—form rcquirod under-this
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

liiiinNiiiMmi

Page 46 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
OGCtion,] gives false information, fails to
declare restricted articles in the person's
possession or baggage, or fails to declare in
cargo manifests is in violation of this section;
(B) [Completed paper forms shall bo collected by■the
breflepeefeebirefi—eempa-ny—aed—tee—de-tiveredT-
immediatcly upon arrival-;—to the inspector at the
first airport or seaport of arrival.-- Completed
electronie forms -shall bo transmitted to the
-ies^eeteer^-teeftere-^aeseegere—departe-^fehe—teirete
airgeet^-e^5—seaperte^-ef—a-retevate-;-- Failure t-a
distribute or eolloct paper declarat-ie-n forms,
-iinmodiatcly deliver completed paper forms,—
transmit completed electronic forms before
paseeegere—depaet—tetee—first- a-lar-port or scapo-rt of
-ar^fival^^rs—a-^vieiateieft—ef—teteie—seeteefi-;—aed] Aid.
passengers, officers, and crew members who are
bringing or causing to be brought for entry into
the State domestic and other animals cited in
chapter 142, in addition to the articles
enumerated in this chapter, shall immediately
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

liifflmiiiiiiiaMH

Page 47 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
upon arrival or prior to arrival notify the
department of the arrival of any restricted
article. The department may adopt rules
necessary to effectuate this subparagraph; and
(C) It shall be the responsibility of the officers
and crew of an aircraft or vessel originating in
the continental United States or its possessions
or from any other area not under the jurisdiction
of the appropriate federal agency to immediately
report all sightings of any plants and animals to
the plant quarantine branch. Failure to comply
with this requirement is a violation of this
section;
[-(-3-)- Plant and animal dec-larat-ion-- form.-- The form shall
include direetieno for declaring ■domestic and-- other
animals—cited in chapter 3r42,—in addition to the
antiei-ca---enumerated in this—chapter;
4-4-)-] (3) Labels. Each container in which any of the
above-mentioned articles are imported into the State
shall be plainly and legibly marked, in a conspicuous
manner and place, with the name and address of the
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 48 H.B. NO.
I . . I ’I . g- 22
C.D. 1
shipper or owner forwarding or shipping the same, the
name or mark of the person to whom the same is
forwarded or shipped or the person's agent. the name
of the country, state, or territory and locality
therein where the product was grown or produced, and a
statement of the contents of the container. Upon
failure to comply with this paragraph, the importer or
carrier is in violation of this section;
Authority to inspect. Whenever the inspector has
good cause to believe that the provisions of this
chapter are being violated the inspector may:
(A) Enter and inspect any aircraft, vessel, or other
carrier at any time after its arrival within the
boundaries of the State, whether offshore, at the
pier, or at the airport, for the purpose of
determining whether any of the articles or pests
enumerated in this chapter or rules adopted
thereto, is present;
(B) Enter into or upon any pier, warehouse, airport.
or any other place in the State where any of the
above-mentioned articles are moved or stored, for
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 49 H.B. NO. 5,^
C.D. 1
the purpose of ascertaining, by inspection and
examination, whether [or not] any of the articles
is infested or infected with any pest or disease
or contaminated with soil or contains prohibited
plants or animals; and
(C) Inspect any baggage or personal effects of
disembarking passengers, officers, and crew
members on aircraft or vessels arriving in the
State to ascertain if they contain any of the
articles or pests enumerated in this chapter. No
baggage or other personal effects of the
passengers or crew members shall be released
until the baggage or effects have been passed.
Baggage or cargo inspection shall be made at the
discretion of the inspector, on the pier, vessel, or
aircraft or in any quarantine or inspection area.
Whenever the inspector has good cause to believe
that the provisions of this chapter are being
violated, the inspector may require that any box,
package, suitcase, or any other container carried as
ship's stores, cargo, or otherwise by any vessel or
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 50 H.B. NO. "2
C.D. 1
aircraft moving between the continental United States
and Hawaii or between the [Hawai-a-an--1 slands,■ ] islands
of the State, be opened for inspection to determine
whether any article or pest prohibited by this chapter
or by rules adopted pursuant thereto is present. It
is a violation of this section if any prohibited
article or any pest or any plant, fruit, or vegetable
infested with plant pests is found;
[4-6^] (5) Request for importation and inspection. In
addition to requirements of the United States customs
authorities concerning invoices or other formalities
incident to importations into the State, the importer
shall be required to file a written statement with the
department, signed by the importer or the importer's
agent, setting forth the importer's desire to import
certain of the above-mentioned articles into the State
and:
(A) Giving the following additional information:
(i) The kind (scientific name), quantity, and
description;
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 51 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(ii) The locality where same were grown or
produced;
(iii) Certification that all animals to be
imported are the progeny of captive
populations or have been held in captivity
for a period of one year immediately before
importation or have been specifically
approved for importation by the board;
(iv) The port from which the same were last
shipped;
(v) The name of the shipper; and
(vi) The name of the consignee; and
(B) Containing:
(i) A request that the department, by its duly
authorized agent, examine the articles
described;
(ii) An agreement by the importer to be
responsible for all costs, charges, or
expenses; and
(iii) A waiver of all claims for damages incident
to the inspection or the fumigation,
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

Page 52 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D, 2
C.D. 1
disinfection, quarantine, or destruction of
the articles, or any of them, as hereinafter
provided, if any treatment is deemed
necessary.
Failure or refusal to file a statement, including
the agreement and waiver, is a violation of this
section and may, in the discretion of the department,
be sufficient cause for refusing to permit the entry
of the articles into the State;
[•4^] JAL Place of inspection. If, in the judgment of the
[inopcetordepartment, it is deemed necessary or
advisable to move any of the above-mentioned articles,
or any portion thereof, to a transitional facility or
another place more suitable for inspection than the
pier, airport, or any other place where they are first
received or discharged, the [inspector] department is
authorized to do so[—] or order the importer or
importer's agent to do so. All costs and expenses
incident to the movement and transportation of the
articles to any other place shall be borne by the
importer or the importer's agent. If the importer.
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 53 H.B. NO. 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
importer's agent, or transportation company requests
inspection of sealed containers of the above-mentioned
articles at locations other than where the articles
are first received or discharged or a transitional
facility and the department determines that inspection
at the other place is appropriate, the department may
require payment of costs necessitated by these
inspections, including overtime costs;
[4-84-] (7) Disinfection or quarantine. If, upon inspection,
any article received or brought into the State for the
purpose of debarkation or entry therein is found to be
infested or infected or there is reasonable cause to
presume that it is infested or infected and the
infestation or infection can, in the judgment of the
inspector, be eradicated, a treatment shall be given
[ouch] to the article. The treatment shall be at the
expense of the owner or the owner's agent, and the
treatment shall be as prescribed by the department.
The article shall be held in quarantine at the expense
of the owner or the owner's agent at a satisfactory
place approved by the department for a sufficient
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 54 H.B. NO.
-2
C.D, 1
length of time to determine that eradication has been
accomplished. If the infestation or infection is of
the nature or extent that it cannot be effectively and
completely eradicated, or if it is a potentially
destructive pest or it is not widespread in the State,
or after treatment it is determined that the
infestation or infection is not completely eradicated,
or if the owner or the owner's agent refuses to allow
the article to be treated or to be responsible for the
cost of treatment and quarantine, the article, or any
II portion thereof, together with all packing and
containers, may, at the discretion of the inspector,
be destroyed or sent out of the State at the expense
of the owner or the owner's agent. The destruction or
exclusion shall not be made the basis of a claim
against the department or the inspector for damage or
loss incurred;
[4^-)-] (8) Disposition. Upon completion of inspection,
either at the time of arrival or at any time
thereafter should any article be held for inspection,
treatment, or quarantine, the inspector shall affix to
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

iiHiiniiiiinuiiiim

Page 55 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the article or the container or to the delivery order
in a conspicuous place thereon, a tag, label, or stamp
to indicate that the article has been inspected and
passed. This action shall constitute a permit to
bring the article into the State; and
[(lOP] (9) Ports of entry. None of the articles mentioned
in this section shall be allowed entry into the State
except through the airports and seaports in the State
designated and approved by the board."
SECTION 29. Section 150A-5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) In legal effect, articles landed for the purpose of
inspection or quarantine shall be construed to be still outside
the State seeking entry, and shall not, in whole or in part, be
considered suitable for entry into the State unless a tag,
label, or stamp has been affixed to the article, its container,
or its delivery order by the inspector as provided in section
[ 150A-5 (-9) , ] 150A-5 (8) , except that articles quarantined in the
biocontrol containment facilities of the department or of other
government agencies engaged in joint projects with the
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 56 H1 1 ..B1-X .. Ni 'I OV ..
".
h
g 2
C.D. 1
department may be released upon issuance of a permit approved by
the board."
SECTION 30. Section 150A-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§150A-8 Transporting in State. Flora and fauna
specified by rules and regulations of the department shall not
be moved from one island to another island within the State or
from one locality to another on the same island except by a
permit issued by the department.
(b) The movement between the islands of the State of the
following articles, viz., nursery-stock, tree, shrub, herb,
vine, cut-flower, cut-foliage, cutting, graft, scion, bud, seed,
leaf, root, or rhizome; nut, fruit, or vegetable; grain, cereal,
or legume in the natural or raw state; moss, hay, straw, dry­
grass, or other forage; unmanufactured log, limb, or timber, or
any other plant-growth or plant-product, unprocessed or in the
raw state; soil; microorganisms; live bird, reptile, nematode,
insect, or any other animal in any stage of development (that is
in addition to the so-called domestic animal, the quarantine of
which is provided for in chapter 142); box, vehicle, baggage, or
any other container in which the articles have been transported
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 5

Page 57 H.B. NO. a.
C.D. 1
or any packing material used in connection therewith shall be
made in the manner hereinafter set forth:
(1) Inspectional requirements. Any person who receives
for transport/ or brings or causes movement between
the islands of the State, as freight, air freight,
baggage, as ship's stores, or otherwise, any of the
foregoing articles, shall ensure that the articles
comply with inspectional requirements pursuant to
rules and shall provide upon the inspector's request
the waybill number, container number, name and address
of the consignor, name and address of the consignee or
the consignee's agent, marks, number of packages,
description of contents of each package, and any other
information that may be necessary to inspect, locate,
or identify the same. If the articles are not
inspected pursuant to rules, the articles shall be
held in a manner that they will not spread or be
likely to spread any infestation or infection of
insects, diseases, or pests that may be present until
an inspection can be made by the inspector to
determine whether any article, or any portion thereof.
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

iiniKiiimHiiniii

Page 58 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
is infested or infected with insects or diseases, or
contains any pest. The department may adopt rules to
define inspectional requirements of specific articles.
Failure to obtain certification that the articles have
met the inspectional requirements prior to movement
bejtween the i£larids of yie Stat^Ls a v iol^tdon of
this section;
(2) Labels. Each container in which any of the
above-mentioned articles are transported between the
islands of the State shall be plainly and legibly
marked, in a conspicuous manner and place, with the
name and address of the shipper or owner forwarding or
shipping the same, the name or mark of the person to
whom the same is forwarded or shipped or the person's
agent, and a statement of the contents of the
container. Failure to comply with this paragraph is a
violation of this section;
(3) Authority to inspect. Whenever the inspector has good
cause to believe that the provisions of this chapter
are being violated, the inspector shall;
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

mMiiiniHiHiHiiiii

Page 59 H.B. NO.
C.D, 1
(A) Enter and inspect any aircraft, vessel, or other
carrier at any time whether offshore, at the
pier, or at the airport, for the purpose of
determining whether any of the articles or pests
enumerated in this chapter or rules adopted
thereto, is present;
(B) Enter into or upon any pier, warehouse, airport,
or any other place in the State where any of the
above-mentioned articles are moved or stored, for
the purpose of ascertaining, by inspection and
examination, whether or not any of the articles
is infested or infected with any pest or disease
or contaminated with soil or contains prohibited
plants or animals;
(C) Inspect any baggage or personal effects of
passengers, officers, and crew members on
aircraft or vessels moving between the islands of
the State to ascertain if they contain any of the
articles or pests enumerated in this chapter;
(D) Baggage or cargo inspection shall be made at the
discretion of the Inspector, on the pier, vessel,
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 60 H.B. NO. fh
C.D. 1
or a ircr^^ft o£in aj2i;qua^caTitAne or ins£ection
area; and
Wh^neye£th^3jiS£ect^r j7a s 2ood cause t^beJAeye
that the provisions of this chapter are being
violated, the inspector shall require that any
box, package, suitcase, or any other container
carried as ship's stores, cargo, or otherwise by
any vessel or aircraft moving between the islands
of the State, be opened for inspection to
determine whether any article or pest prohibited
by this chapter or by rules adopted pursuant
thereto is present. It is a violation of this
section if any prohibited article, pest, or any
article infested with an insect or disease is
found;
(4) Place of inspection. The inspector shall make a
determination whether it is necessary or advisable to
move any of the above-mentioned articles, or any
portion thereof, to a place more suitable for
inspection than the pier, airport, or any other place
where they are initially presented for inspection.
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

Page 61 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
All costs and expenses incident to the movement and
transportation of the articles to such place shall be
borne by the consignee or the consignee's agent;
Disinfection or quarantine. If, upon inspection, any
article intended for movement between the islands of
the State is found to be infested or infected with an
insect, disease, or pest, or there is reasonable cause
to presume that it is infested or infected and the
infestation or infection can, in the judgment of the
inspector, be eradicated, a treatment shall be given
such article prior to movement between the islands of
the State. The treatment shall be at the expense of
the owner or the owner's agent, and the treatment
shall be as prescribed by the department. The article
shall be quarantined at the expense of the owner or
the owner's agent at a satisfactory place approved by
the department for a sufficient length of time to
determine that eradication has been accomplished. If
the infestation or infection is of such nature or
extent that it cannot be effectively and completely
eradicated, or after treatment it is determined that
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 62 H.B. NO.
-2
h
C.D. 1
the infestation or infection is not completely
eradicated, or if the owner or the owner's agent
refuses to allow the article to be treated or to be
responsible for the cost of treatment and quarantine,
the shipment, article, or any portion thereof,
together with all packing and containers, shall not be
certified for movement between the islands of the
State. An article infested or infected with an
insect, disease, or pest that is not widespread in the
State shall be destroyed at the expense of the owner
or the owner's agent; provided that no treatment
exists that would eradicate the insect, disease, or
pest to the satisfaction of the department. Such
destruction shall not be made the basis of a claim
against the department or the inspector for damage or
loss incurred; and
(6) Disposition. Upon completion of inspection, the
inspector shall conspicuously affix to the article,
container, or to the delivery order or other similar
document, a tag, label, or stamp to indicate that the
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

nNHIMUMHIIIinill

Page 63 H.B. NO.
I
[^ 2
C.D. 1
article has been inspected and can be moved between
the islands of the State."
SECTION 31. Section 150A-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (b) through (g) to read as
follows:
"(b) Any person who violates section 150A-5 or 150A-F
shall be [guilty-of a petty mjrS dome uno r and] fined [not’ no less
than $100 and [net] n_o more than [$5,000.] $10, 000. For a
second [■ef^fefi-&e] violation committed within five years of a
prior [offense,] violation, the person may be fined [net] no
less than [-^S-S-G-] $500 and [net] more than [$15,0-QO. ] $25,000.
(c) Any person who:
(1) Violates section 150A-6(3) or [-1-5-QA-6 (-4) , ] (4) , or
owns or intentionally transports, possesses, harbors,
transfers, or causes the importation of any snake or
other prohibited animal seized under section
150A-7(b), or whose violation involves an animal that
is prohibited [er^]_^ a plant [—] that is restricted, or
an animal [7-] or microorganism that is restricted [—] or
unlisted, without a permit, shall be guilty of a
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 64 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
misdemeanor and subject to a fine of [ftefe] no less
than $5, 000, but [fiefe] no more than $20,000;
(2) Intentionally transports, transfers, possesses,
harbors, or imports with the intent to propagate,
sell, or release any animal that is prohibited [or any
plant,—animal], a plant that is restricted, or an
animal or microorganism that is restricted[—] or
unlisted, without a permit, shall be guilty of a class
C felony and subject to a fine of [fiet] rw less than
$50,000, but no more than $200,000; or
(3) Intentionally imports, possesses, harbors, transfers,
or transports, including through interisland or
intraisland movement, with the intent to propagate,
sell, or release, any pest designated by statute or
rule, unless otherwise allowed by law, shall be guilty
of a class C felony and subject to a fine of [net] no
less than $50,000, but [net] no more than $200,000.
(d) Whenever a court sentences a person or organization
pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) for an offense [whurefe] that
has resulted in the escape or establishment of any pest or
animal or microorganism that is restricted or unlisted and
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 65 H.B. NO.
C.D, 1
caused the department to initiate a program to capture, control,
or eradicate that pest[—] or animal or microorganism that is
restricted or unlisted, the court shall also require that the
person or organization pay to the state general fund an amount
of money to be determined in the discretion of the court upon
advice of the department, based upon the cost of the development
and implementation of the program.
(e) The department may, at its discretion, refuse entry,
confiscate, or destroy any prohibited [aar-fe-i-cloo orlj_ restricted2_
or unlisted articles that are brought into the State without a
permit issued by the department, or order the return of any
plant, fruit, vegetable, or any other article infested with
insects, diseases, or pests to its place of origin or otherwise
dispose of it or such part thereof as may be necessary to comply
with this chapter. Any expense or loss in connection therewith
shall be borne by the owner or the owner's agent.
(f) Any person or organization that voluntarily surrenders
any pest, prohibited animal, or any restricted plant, animal, or
microorganism without a permit issued by the department, prior
to the initiation of any seizure action by the department, shall
be exempt from the penalties of this section.
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO g.

Page 66 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(g) For purposes of this section, "intent to propagate"
shall be presumed when the person in question is found to
possess, transfer, transport, harbor, or import:
(1) Any two or more animal specimens of the opposite sex
that are prohibited, unlisted, or restricted, without
a permit, or are a pest designated by statute or rule;
(2) Any three or more animal specimens of either sex that
are prohibited, unlisted, or restricted, without a
permit, or are a pest designated by statute or rule;
(3) Any plant that is restricted or microorganism that is
restricted or unlisted, having the inherent capability
to reproduce [and—that is restricted], without a
permit; or
(4) Any specimen that is in the process of reproduction."
SECTION 32. Section 150A-54, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) The department shall set and impose charges for the
inspection, quarantine, and eradication of pests in accordance
with this chapter and chapter 141 [-r] , including imposing charges
on an importer for using a transitional facility. The
department shall deposit the charges into the pest inspection,
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 66
■fliiiiiiwiHiiiiiiiin

Page 67 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
quarantine, and eradication fund established pursuant to
section 150A-4.5."
PART V
SECTION 33. The purpose of this part is to:
(1) Authorize the department of agriculture and
biosecurity to enter into agreements with private
industries for readiness and response to prevent and
address unwanted organisms; and
(2) Establish a pest dashboard.
SECTION 34. Chapter 150A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new sections to part VI to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
”§150A-F Government-Industry agreements for readiness and
response. (a) The department may enter into readiness and
response agreements with businesses and representatives of
businesses in the plant and animal industries of the State,
including businesses that grow, harvest, or produce animals and
plants or products from animals and plants.
(b) The agreements shall include:
(1) Readiness activities that:
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 68 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(A) Prevent unwanted organisms from entering the
State; and
(B) Detect unwanted organisms; and
(2) Response activities that;
(A) Facilitate the immediate investigation of an
unwanted organism after detection, including
timely reporting of the unwanted organism's
detection to the department;
(B) Minimize the impact of the unwanted organism on
natural and physical resources, human health, and
overseas market access for Hawaii products;
(C) Control the spread of an unwanted organism;
(D) Reduce the geographical distribution of an
unwanted organism;
(E) Eradicate the unwanted organism; and
(F) Include providing the department with relevant
information for posting to the pest dashboard
pursuant to section 141-3.5.
(c) A violation of an applicable readiness plan shall be
subject to penalties under section 150A-14.
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 69 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
§150A-G Biosecurity and pest management plans. (a) Any
person, including any unit of state or local government, may
submit to the board a proposed biosecurity or pest management
plan. The proposed biosecurity or pest management plan shall
include:
The name of the person or organization submitting the
proposed biosecurity or pest management plan;
(2) The organism proposed to be classified as a pest;
provided that a proposed biosecurity or pest
management plan may encompass a category of organisms
proposed to be classified as pests;
(3) A description of the organism's adverse effects;
(4) A description of the region of the proposed plan or
whether the proposed plan will be implemented
statewide;
(5) The reason for the proposed plan;
(6) Objectives of the proposed plan;
(7) The principal measures to achieve the objectives and
alternative measures, if any;
(8) An allocation of the costs, if applicable;
(9) Proposed funding; and
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

ininuiiiiHUiiiiiiiiiniii

Page 70 H.B. NO. iS.2
C.D. 1
(10) Other information as required by the department.
(b) The board shall review the proposed plan, taking into
consideration:
(1) Whether the implementation of the proposed plan is
likely to eradicate or effectively manage the organism
proposed to be declared a pest;
(2) Whether the proposed plan is inconsistent with any
federal or state requirement, activity, or policy;
(3) Any harmful effects of denying the proposed
biosecurity or pest management plan;
(4) Whether the benefits of the proposed plan would
outweigh the costs; and
(5) Other considerations established by the department.
(c) At a public hearing, the board shall approve the
proposed plan, deny the proposed plan, or approve the proposed
plan with modifications.
(d) The department may negotiate with the person who
submitted the proposed plan or any other person before taking
action.
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 71 H.B. NO 427
H.D, 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(e) The board shall publish each proposed plan it approves
and each proposed plan it approves with modifications. These
shall be known as "approved plans".
(f) The department may enter into contracts to implement
approved plans.
(g) A pest management plan that was previously disapproved
may be resubmitted to the board upon the chairperson's
determination that the proposed management plan is significantly
different from the previously disapproved request."
SECTION 35. Section 141-3.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
n amended to read as follows:
"§141-3.5 Control or eradication programs. (a) The
department of agriculture and biosecurity shall develop and
implement a detailed control or eradication program for any pest
designated in section 141-3, using the best available technology
in a manner consistent with state and federal law.
(b) The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall:
(1) Lead and coordinate the State's invasive pest control
and eradication biosecurity efforts;
(2) Engage in memorandums of understanding with
interagency partners and private organizations;
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO 7]
immiHiffliii

Page 72 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(3) Approve of memorandums of understanding with submitted
working plans to execute control and eradication
programs; and
(4) Include in its annual report to the legislature
pursuant to section 150A-57 any memorandums of
understanding and partnerships pursuant to paragraphs
(2) and (3) to advance the State's invasive pest
control and eradication biosecurity efforts.
(c) For any pest designated by emergency rule as provided
in section 141-3, the department of agriculture and biosecurity
shall implement an emergency program using the best available
technology in a manner consistent with state and federal law.
(d) The department of agriculture [4-] and biosecurity:
(1) In conjunction with the department of land and natural
resources; department of health; department of
transportation; department of business, economic
development, and tourism; university of Hawaii system;
or state and privately organized agencies and
programs, as applicable, shall identify best practices
for the treatment of pests designated in section 141-
3;
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 73 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) Shall post on its website [any] infestation updates
and data, including [eay] real-time geographic
information system map data, and best practices
identified for the treatment of pests designated in
section 141-3, as prioritized by the department [-r]
No later than December 1, 2025, the department shall
establish a pest dashboard to provide real-time data
and information for treatment areas of pests
designated in section 141-3 to the public. The
dashboard shall be updated regularly and be hosted and
managed by the department;
(3) Shall, along with contracted parties, document past
responses in the department's geographic information
system database; provided that the information shall
include date, location, names of individual
participants, organization, activities performed, and
presence and absence of pests; provided further that
the disclosure of information shall be under the
jurisdiction of the department; and
(4) Shall, along with contracted parties, provide notice
to the department's pesticides branch prior to usage
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 74 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
of pesticides in the course of controlling pests.
Upon receipt of notification, pesticide inspectors may
perform random inspections to ensure compliance with
pesticide laws and regulations. The department of
agriculture and biosecurity, department of land and
natural resources, and contracted parties pursuant to
section 150A-F shall regularly and timely post
treatment area information to the pest dashboard.
(e) Any state department, agency, political subdivision,
or contracted party pursuant to section 150A-F that does not
provide information for the pest dashboard in compliance with
this section shall not receive or expend public funds. The
deputy chairperson for biosecurity shall be responsible for
ensuring compliance with this section."
PART VI
SECTION 36. The legislature finds that treating plant care
components, which includes any quantity of wood chips, compost,
or filter socks, reduces potential pests and increases the
State's overall biosecurity. Act 197, Session Laws of Hawaii
2024 (Act 197), requires the department of agriculture to
certify plant care component treatments performed within the
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO


Page 75 H.B. NO. gj
C.D. 1
State. The purpose of this part is to expressly provide the
department of agriculture and biosecurity with the rulemaking
authority to adopt administrative rules and to assess
administrative penalties to fully effectuate Act 197.
SECTION 37. Section 141-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§141-2 Rules. Subject to chapter 91, the department of
agriculture and biosecurity shall adopt, amend, and repeal rules
not inconsistent with law, for and concerning:
(1) The introduction, transportation, and propagation of
trees, shrubs, herbs, and other plants;
(2) The quarantine, inspection, fumigation, disinfection,
destruction, or exclusion, either upon introduction
into the State, or at any time or place within the
State, of any nursery-stock, tree, shrub, herb, vine,
cut-flower, cut-foliage, cutting, graft, scion, bud,
seed, leaf, root, or rhizome; any nut, fruit, or
vegetable; any grain, cereal, or legume in the natural
or raw state; any moss, hay, straw, dry-grass, or
other forage; any unmanufactured log, limb, or timber;
or any other plant growth or plant product unprocessed
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 7

Page 76 H.B. NO. "o.
C.D. 1
or in the raw state; any sand, soil, or earth; any
live bird, reptile, insect, or other animal, in any
stage of development, that is in addition to the so-
called domestic animals, which are provided for in
section 142-2; and any box, barrel, crate, or other
containers in which the articles, substances, or
objects have been transported or contained, and any
packing material used in connection therewith, that is
or may be diseased or infested with insects or likely
to assist in the transmission or dissemination of any
insect or plant disease injurious, harmful, or
detrimental, or likely to become injurious, harmful,
or detrimental to the agricultural or horticultural
industries or the forests of the State, or that is or
may be in itself injurious, harmful, or detrimental to
the same; provided that included therein may be rules
governing the transportation of any of the articles,
substances, or objects enumerated above in this
section between different localities on any one of the
islands within the State;
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 77 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(3) The prohibition of importation into the State, from
any or all foreign countries or from other parts of
the United States, or the shipment from one island
within the State to another island therein, or the
transportation from one part or locality of any island
to another part or locality of the same island, of any
specific article, substance, or object or class of
articles, substances, or objects, among those
enumerated above in this section, that is diseased or
infested with insects or likely to assist in the
transmission or dissemination of any insect or plant
disease injurious, harmful, or detrimental or likely
to be injurious, harmful, or detrimental to the
agricultural or horticultural industries, or the
forests of the State, or that is or may be in itself
injurious, harmful, or detrimental to the same;
(4) The preparation by cargo carriers of manifests of
cargo transported into the State or between islands of
the State and the submission of the manifests to the
department;
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO

Page 78 H.B. NO. S =
C.D. 1
(5) The establishment, maintenance, and enforcement of
compliance agreements with federal or state
departments of agriculture authorizing agriculture
inspectors from the state of origin in the case of
imports to the State, or state agricultural inspectors
in the case of state exports, to monitor the growing
and packing of plant commodities and any treatment
procedures to ensure compliance with quarantine laws,
and further authorizing the assessment of fees for
conducting inspections required under the compliance
agreement; [and]
(6) The manner in which agricultural product promotion and
research activities may be undertaken, after
coordinating with the agribusiness development
corporation[—]£
(7) The establishment, fee schedule, appropriate
treatments, certification requirements, restrictions,
and enforcement of or for a plant care component
program; and
(8) Any otlier purpose witlTdni tl}ls pa^^
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

■■■iiiiiiiiigHii

Page 79 H.B. NO. S.
C.D. 1
All rules adopted under this section shall have the force
and effect of law."
SECTION 38. Section 141-18, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-{■] §141-18 [i-] Plant care components; fumigation;
treatment; certification; fees; restrictions. (a) The
department of agriculture [4-] and biosecurity:
(1) Shall certify plant care component treatments
performed within the State;
(2) May certify and permit entities to conduct plant care
component treatments before shipment; and
(3) Shall deposit any fees collected for certifications of
plant care component treatment pursuant to section
150A-21 into the pest inspection, quarantine, and
eradication fund established pursuant to section
150A-4.5.
(b) No person shall distribute within the State any plant
care component that originated outside the State, unless [the]2.
(1) The plant care component was subject to a treatment
before entering the State; or
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 80 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) The plant care component has been treated immediately
after [ontoring] arriving in the State, as certified
by the department of agriculture[—] and biosecurity.
(c) No person shall transport any plant care component:
(1) Between the islands of the State; or
(2) From a location within the State to a location outside
the State,
without prior certification from the department of agriculture
and biosecurity that the component has been treated pursuant to
this section; provided that the component shall be stored in a
manner to prohibit infestation post-treatment.
(d) Any person who violates any provision of this section
or rules adopted under this section may be assessed an
administrative penalty by the board of not more than $10,000 for
each offense. No administrative penalty shall be assessed
unless the person charged has been given notice and an
• 17 opportunity for a hearing on the specific charge. The
administrative penalty and any proposed action contained in the
notice of finding of violation shall become a final order
unless, within twenty days of receipt of the notice, the person
or persons charged make a written request for a hearing. In
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 80
■■■nniiiim

Page 81 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
determining the amount of penalty, the board shall consider the
appropriateness of the penalty to the size of the business of
the person charged, the effect on the person's ability to
continue business, and the gravity of the violation.
(e) In case of inability to collect the administrative
penalty or failure of any person to pay all or a portion of the
administrative penalty as the board may determine, the board
shall refer the matter to the attorney general, who shall
recover the amount by action in the appropriate court. For any
judicial proceeding to recover the administrative penalty
imposed, the attorney general need only show that notice was
given, a hearing was held or the time granted for requesting a
hearing has expired without such a request, the administrative
penalty was imposed, and the penalty remains unpaid.
(f) When construing and enforcing this section, the act,
omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or other person
acting for or employed by any person shall in every case be also
deemed to be the act, omission, or failure of such person as
well as that of the person employed.
[-(-d)-] (g) For the purposes of this section:
"Board” means board of agriculture and biosecurity.
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


Page 82 H.B. NO. "02
C.D. 1
"Filter sock" means a mesh tube that contains organic plant
material, which is used for erosion control.
2Person^^jTieaiis ai}indlyidAial j£irr[p cor£or^tdon^
association, or partnership or any organized group of persons
whether incorporated or not.
"Plant care component" or "component" means any quantity of
wood chips [7-] or compost [—] that is used in the propagation of
plants or in a filter [e-ecks. ] sock.
"Treat" or "treatment" means fumigation or heat treatment."
PART VII
SECTION 39. All rights, powers, functions, and duties of
the Hawaii invasive species council are transferred from the
department of land and natural resources to the department of
agriculture and biosecurity.
All officers and employees whose functions are transferred
by this Act shall be transferred with their functions and shall
continue to perform their regular duties upon their transfer,
subject to the state personnel laws and this Act.
No officer or employee of the State having tenure shall
suffer any loss of salary, seniority, prior service credit,
vacation, sick leave, or other employee benefit or privilege as
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 8'

Page 83 H.B. NO. g-
C.D. 1
a consequence of this Act, and such officer or employee may be
transferred or appointed to a civil service position without the
necessity of examination; provided that the officer or employee
possesses the minimum qualifications for the position to which
transferred or appointed; and provided that subsequent changes
in status may be made pursuant to applicable civil service and
compensation laws.
An officer or employee of the State who does not have
tenure and who may be transferred or appointed to a civil
service position as a consequence of this Act shall become a
civil service employee without the loss of salary, seniority,
prior service credit, vacation, sick leave, or other employee
benefits or privileges and without the necessity of examination;
provided that such officer or employee possesses the minimum
qualifications for the position to which transferred or
appointed.
If an office or position held by an officer or employee
having tenure is abolished, the officer or employee shall not
thereby be separated from public employment, but shall remain in
the employment of the State with the same pay and classification
and shall be transferred to some other office or position for
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO

■■iMiiiiiiiniiiiii

Page 84 H.B. NO.
"-2
C.D. 1
which the officer or employee is eligible under the personnel
laws of the State as determined by the head of the department or
the governor.
SECTION 40. All appropriations, records, equipment,
machines, files, supplies, contracts, books, papers, documents,
maps, and other personal property heretofore made, used,
acquired, or held by the department of land and natural
resources relating to the functions of the Hawaii invasive
special council that are transferred to the department of
agriculture and biosecurity shall be transferred with the
functions to which they relate.
PART VIII
SECTION 41. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,250,000 or much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the
operations of the Hawaii invasive species council.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 42, There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,250,000 or so much
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 84

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
operations of the Hawaii invasive species council.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 43. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or much
thereof as may be necessary for the fiscal year 2025-2026 and
the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2026-2027 for the operations of the Hawaii Ant Lab.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 44. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the operations of the coconut rhinoceros beetle
response under the university of Hawaii.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university
of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act.
PART IX
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO
niiiiiHiHiioMimii

Page 86 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 45. In codifying the new sections added by
sections 26 and 34 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall
substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in
designating the new sections in this Act.
SECTION 46. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 47. This Act shall take effect as follows:
(1) Part I shall take effect upon approval of this Act;
provided that if part I takes effect before June 30,
2025, the amendments made to section 167-6, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, by section 18 of this Act shall not
be repealed when that section is repealed and
reenacted on June 30, 2025, pursuant to Act 223,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2014;
(2) Part II shall take effect on January 1, 2027;
(3) Part III and sections 25, 26, 27, and 32 shall take
effect on January 1, 2028;
(4) Sections 30 and 31 and parts V and VIII shall take
effect on July 1, 2025;
(5) Part VI shall take effect upon approval of this Act;
(6) Part VII shall take effect on January 1, 2030; and
2025-3271 HB427 CDl HMSO 8(

Page 87 H.B. NO 427
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(7) Sections 28 and 29 and Part IX shall take effect upon
approval of this Act.
2025-3271 HB427 GDI HMSO


H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 427, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 427, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
220